Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 3. Sex Offender Registration

For discussion of Wyoming Sex Offenders Registration Act as constitutional,

see Snyder v. State, 912 P.2d 1127,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53 Am. Jur. 2d Mentally Impaired Persons §§ 137 to 149.

57 C.J.S. Mental Health §§ 248 to 253.

§ 7-19-301.
Definitions.

Unless otherwise provided, for the purposes of this act:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 160, § 2.

“Convicted” includes pleas of guilty, nolo contendere, verdicts of guilty upon which a judgment of conviction may be rendered and adjudications as a delinquent for offenses specified in W.S. 7-19-302(j). “Convicted” shall not include dispositions pursuant to W.S.

7-13-301

;

“Criminal offense against a minor” means the offenses specified in this paragraph in which the victim is less than eighteen (18) years of age. “Criminal offense against a minor” includes an offense committed in another jurisdiction, including a federal court or courts martial, which, if committed in this state, would constitute a “criminal offense against a minor” as defined in this paragraph. “Criminal offense against a minor” includes:

Kidnapping under W.S.

6-2-201

;

Felonious restraint under W.S.

6-2-202

;

False imprisonment under W.S.

6-2-203

;

Offenses under W.S.

6-4-101

through

6-4-103

in which a minor is the object of the sexual act or proposed sexual act;

Producing obscene material under W.S.

6-4-302

if the offense involves the use of a minor in a sexual performance;

Soliciting sexual conduct under W.S.

6-2-318

;

Sexual exploitation of a child under W.S.

6-4-303

;

An attempt to commit an offense described in subparagraphs (A) through (G) of this paragraph;

Human trafficking under W.S.

6-2-702

or

6-2-703

or sexual servitude under W.S.

6-2-705

or

6-2-706

.

“Department” means the state department of corrections;

“Division” means the Wyoming division of criminal investigation created within the office of the attorney general;

“Minor” means a person who has not attained the age of eighteen (18) years at the time of the offense;

“Offender” means a person convicted of a criminal offense specified in W.S. 7-19-302(g) through (j),

6-2-702

,

6-2-703

,

6-2-705

or

6-2-706

. “Offender” shall also include any person convicted:

As an accessory before the fact as provided in W.S.

6-1-201

for a criminal offense specified in W.S. 7-19-302(g) through (j), 6-2-702, 6-2-703, 6-2-705 or 6-2-706;

Of a criminal offense in Wyoming or any other jurisdiction containing the same or similar elements, or arising out of the same or similar facts or circumstances, as a criminal offense specified in W.S. 7-19-302(g) through (j), 6-2-702, 6-2-703, 6-2-705 or 6-2-706.

“Predatory” means an act directed at a stranger or a person with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of victimization;

“Recidivist” means an offender convicted of an offense requiring registration under this act two (2) or more times. Offenses which would have required registration under this act, but which had a sentencing date prior to January 1, 1985, shall be counted as convictions for purposes of this paragraph;

“Reside” and words of similar import mean the physical address of each residence of an offender, including:

All real property owned by the offender that is used by the offender for the purpose of shelter or other activities of daily living;

Any physical address where the offender habitually visits; and

Temporary residences such as hotels, motels, public or private housing, camping areas, parks, public buildings, streets, roads, highways, restaurants, libraries or other places the offender may frequent and use for shelter or other activities of daily living.

through (xiv) Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 160, § 2.

“This act” means W.S.

7-19-301

through

7-19-310

;

“Attending school” means enrollment on a full or part-time basis at any institution;

“Employed” means any full or part-time employment, with or without compensation or other benefit, for a period of more than fourteen (14) days, or for an aggregate period exceeding thirty (30) days in any one (1) calendar year. Institutional contractors and contract employees performing work on an educational institution campus shall be considered institution employees;

“Educational institution” or “institution” means any type of public or private educational facility or program, including elementary, middle and high schools, parochial, church and religious schools as defined by W.S. 21-4-101(a)(iv), trade and professional schools, colleges and universities;

“Residence” means a dwelling place with an established physical address or identifiable physical location intended for human habitation;

“Report” means providing information in person, or by any other means authorized by the sheriff if the person is required to report to the sheriff;

“Working days” shall not include Saturdays, Sundays and legal holidays;

“Vehicle” includes any of the following that is registered under Wyoming law:

Aircraft as defined in W.S. 10-1-101(a)(i);

Motor vehicle, commercial vehicle or trailer as defined in W.S.

31-1-101

;

Watercraft as defined in W.S. 41-13-101(a)(vii).

Words in the plural form include the singular and words in the singular form include the plural.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 60, § 1; 1999, ch. 203, § 2; 2000, ch. 81, § 1; 2005, ch. 218, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 159, § 2, ch. 160, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 162, § 1; 2011, ch. 179, § 1; 2013 ch. 91, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 13, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the proviso at the beginning of (a); added (a)(iv)(G), redesignating former (a)(iv)(G) as (a)(iv)(H) and updating an internal reference accordingly; in (a)(xi) substituted “residence” for “domicile” and “ten (10)” for “thirty (30)”; added (a)(xvi) through (a)(xix); and made stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “7-19-307” for “7-19-308.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 159, § 1, effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iv)(F) substituted “6-2-318” for “14-3-104” at the end of the sentence.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 160, § 2, effective July 1, 2007, repealed former (a)(i) and (a)(ii), which pertained to the meanings of “‘Aggravated sex offender,’” and “‘Aggravated sex offense’”; in (a)(viii), deleted “sex offender or a” preceding “person convicted of a,” substituted “specified in W.S. 7-19-203(g) through (j), or convicted of a criminal offense from Wyoming or any other jurisdiction containing the same or similar elements, or arising out of the same or similar facts or circumstances, as a criminal offense specified in W.S. 7-19-302(g) through (j)” for “against a minor”; added (xx) through (xxi); and repealed former (a)(xii) through (a)(xiv), which pertained to the meanings of “‘Sex offender,’” “‘Sex offense,’” and “‘Sexually violent predator.’”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been set out above.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(xi), substituted “the physical address of each residence of an offender, including” for “having established a permanent or temporary residence for ten (10) or more days”; and added (a)(xi)(A) through (a)(xi)(C).

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iii), inserted “and adjudications as a delinquent for offenses specified in W.S. 7-19-302(j)”; added (a)(xxii) and (a)(xxiii); and made stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (a)(iv)(J); and added “6-2-702,

6-2-703

,

6-2-705

or

6-2-706

” in (a)(viii).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (a)(xv), substituted “7-19-309” for “7-19-307.”

The 2017 amendments. —

The first 2017 amendment, by ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(viii), deleted ”or
convicted of a criminal offense from Wyoming or any other jurisdiction
containing the same or similar elements, or arising out of the same
or similar facts or
circumstances, as a criminal offense specified
in W.S. 7-19-302(g) through (j),

6-2-702

,

6-2-703

,

6-2-705

or

6-2-706

”
following “or

6-2-706

”; added ““Offender”
shall also include any person convicted” at the end of the
first paragraph; and added (A) and (B).

The second 2017 amendment, by ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, at the end of (a)(xv), substituted
“7-19-310” for “7-19-309.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Prospective operation. —

Laws 1999, ch. 203, § 4, provides: “Nothing in this act requires an offender who was previously required to register in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

7-19-301

through

7-19-306

prior to the amendments made by this act to register if his duty to register was terminated by the granting of a petition by the court under W.S. 7-19-304(b).”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 4, states as follows: “Notwithstanding subsection 3 of this act, Section 300 (c) as created by the 2006 legislature in House Enrolled Act 11, being original House Bill 0001, is amended to read:

“(c) There is appropriated from the budget reserve account to the legislative stabilization reserve account created by 2005 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 191, Section 4, Section 301(d), one hundred eighty-three million seven hundred nineteen thousand one hundred eighty-eight dollars ($183,719,188.00). This appropriation shall only be transferred as funds become available in the budget reserve account as determined by the state auditor but not later than June 30, 2008. The appropriation in this subsection shall be reduced by an amount necessary to maintain an unappropriated budget reserve account balance on June 30, 2008, of eighty-six million five hundred thousand dollars ($86,500,000.00). The appropriation in this subsection shall not be transferred to the legislative stabilization reserve account until after the state auditor has determined that there will be sufficient funds within the budget reserve account to fulfill all appropriations and transfers from the budget reserve account under this act and any other legislation enacted into law in the 2006 budget session.”

Laws 2007, ch. 160, § 3, states as follows: “There is appropriated two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) from the general fund to the attorney general for the period beginning with the effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2008.
The funds appropriated under this section shall only be used to purchase computer equipment and software necessary to implement the registration and notification requirements under W.S.

7-19-301

through

7-19-307

.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Equal protection.—

This section did not violate the Equal Protection Clause in Wyo. Const. art. I, § 2, as juveniles were afforded the same opportunity as adults to enter into a consent decree deferring their respective cases and have them discharged and never adjudicated delinquent. Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Right To Privacy. —

Sexual offender does not stand on equal footing with the unconvicted as far as his right to be left alone by the government is concerned. The nature of his crime has heightened society's interest in protecting itself from him. In re JJF v. State, 2006 WY 41, 132 P.3d 170,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2006).

Due Process. —

Supreme Court of Wyoming simply does not believe that the possible injury to a sexual offender from erroneous classification is significantly greater than any possible harm to the state. The ‘possible injury’ to the registrant is that he will be classified as a higher risk than what he actually is, with the attendant statutory consequences; the ‘possible harm’ to the State is a new sexual assault victim, with the attendant shattered life. In re JJF v. State, 2006 WY 41, 132 P.3d 170,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2006).

Conflicting legislation. —

Registration
and limited notification requirements for certain adjudicated delinquents
under the Wyoming Sexual Offender Registration Act (WSORA) did not
conflict with the purposes of the Wyoming Juvenile Justice Act (WJJA), Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-6-201

et seq., as the language of the WJJA showed that it was
to be administered to assure public safety as well as promote the
interest of the child and was drafter with knowledge of the WSORA. Vaughn v. State, 2017 WY 29, 391 P.3d 1086,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2017).

Stated

in

Johnson v. State, 922 P.2d 1384,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Andrews v. State, 2002 WY 28, 40 P.3d 708,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2002).